Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended  by section 69, chapter 442,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  As used in sections 1 to 4, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019:
(1) “Contractor” means a person whose trade or business consists of  offering for sale solar
electric systems or paired solar and storage systems or of providing  construction, installation or
design services for solar electric systems or paired solar and storage systems.
(2) “Electric utility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 757.600.
(3) “Energy storage system” means commercially available technology that  is capable of re-
taining energy, storing the energy for a period of time and transmitting the energy after storage.
(4) “Low-income service provider” means a nonresidential customer that provides  health, dental,
social, financial, energy conservation or other assistive services  to low or moderate income persons
or low or moderate income households,  as further defined by the State Department of Energy by
rule.
(5) “Net cost” means  the actual cost of the purchase, construction and installation of a solar
electric system or a paired solar and storage  system, minus any incentive received for the system
from the electric utility serving the customer for which the system is installed.
(6) “Pair” means pairing an energy storage system with a  solar electric system such that
the energy storage system provides storage capacity for electrical energy  produced by the
solar electric system.
[(6)] (7) “Paired solar and storage system” means a solar  electric system and an energy storage
system purchased together, constructed and installed by the same contractor and  paired such that
the energy storage system provides storage capacity for electrical energy produced by  the solar
electric system.
[(7)] (8) “Solar electric system” means any system, mechanism or series of mechanisms, including
photovoltaic systems, that uses solar radiation to generate electrical energy.
SECTION 2.
 Section 2, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1)(a) The State Department of Energy shall adopt by rule  a program for providing re-
bates for the purchase, construction or installation of :
(A) Solar electric systems ;
Enrolled Senate Bill 827 (SB 827-INTRO) Page 1
(B) Energy  storage systems that will be paired at the time of installation with previously
purchased and installed solar electric systems;  and
(C) Paired solar and storage systems.
(b) In adopting rules for and administering  the program, the State Department of Energy may
coordinate or consult with:
(A) The Housing and  Community Services Department and any other relevant state agencies;
and
(B) Entities including, but not limited to, nonprofit organizations and utilities.
[(b)] (c) The State Department of Energy shall make rebates available under the program to be
claimed by a contractor that constructs or installs a solar electric system , an  energy storage
system or a paired solar  and storage system, for a residential customer or a low-income service
provider, on real property in Oregon.  A contractor that claims a rebate under this section must use
the full amount of the rebate to reduce the net cost  to the residential customer or low-income ser-
vice provider of the purchase, construction or installation  of the solar electric system , energy
storage system  or paired solar and storage system for which the rebate is issued.
(2) Rebates under the program shall  be made from moneys credited to the Rooftop Solar Incen-
tive Fund established under section 3 , chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019  [ of this 2019 Act ]. A rebate
may not be made unless there are sufficient moneys available in the fund to make the rebate.
(3) Rules adopted by the department under this section shall  include but need not be limited to:
(a) Preferences  for providing rebates that benefit low and moderate income residential custom-
ers and nonresidential customers that are low-income service providers;
(b) Provisions for  determining eligibility and verification of solar electric systems , energy
storage systems  and paired solar and storage systems for purposes of the rebate program;
(c) Policies and procedures for the administration and enforcement of sections 1 to 4 , chapter
655, Oregon Laws 2019 [of this 2019 Act ], which may include policies and procedures for audits  and
inspections; and
(d) Policies and procedures for determining the rebate amounts available  for solar electric sys-
tems, energy storage systems  and paired solar and storage systems. In determining rebates
amounts, the department:
(A) Shall calculate the rebate amount per  watt of installed capacity based on the projected en-
ergy production of the  constructed and installed solar electric system or paired solar and storage
system over a 20-year period; and
(B) Shall take into consideration evolving market conditions.
(4) Rules adopted by the department may include provisions for consumer protection.
[(4)] (5) The amount that may be claimed as a rebate under this section may  not exceed the
following limits:
(a) For a system installed for a low or moderate income residential customer  that is :
(A) A solar electric system,  60 percent of the net cost of the solar electric system or $5,000,
whichever is less; [ and]
(B) An energy storage system, 60 percent of the net cost of the energy storage system
or $2,500, whichever is less; and
(C) [ If the solar electric system is part of ] A paired solar and storage system, 60 percent of the
net cost of the solar electric system or $5,000,  whichever is less, and  an additional amount that
is equal to 60 percent of the net cost of the energy storage system or $2,500, whichever is less.
(b) For a system installed for a  residential customer that is not low or moderate income  that
is:
(A) A solar electric system,  40 percent of the net cost of the solar  electric system or $5,000,
whichever is less; [ and]
(B) An energy storage system, 40 percent of the net cost of the energy storage system
or $2,500, whichever is less; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 827 (SB 827-INTRO) Page 2
(C) [ If the solar electric system is part of ] A paired solar and storage system, 40 percent of the
net cost of the solar electric system or $5,000,  whichever is less, and  an additional amount that
is equal to 40 percent of the net cost of the energy storage system or $2,500, whichever is less.
(c) For a system installed for a low-income service provider  that is :
(A) A solar electric system,  50 percent of the net cost of the solar electric  system or $30,000,
whichever is less; [ and]
(B) An energy storage system, 60 percent of the net cost of the energy storage system
or $15,000, whichever is less; and
(C) [ If the solar electric system is part of ] A paired solar and storage system, 60 percent of the
net cost of the solar electric system or $30,000, whichever is less, and  an  additional amount
that is equal to 60 percent of the  net cost of the energy storage system or $15,000, whichever is less.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) To be eligible to claim a rebate on behalf of a customer under this  section, a
contractor that constructs or installs a solar electric system , energy storage  system  or a paired
solar and storage system must, at the time of the construction or installation:
(A) Hold any license, bond, insurance  or permit required to sell and construct or install the
solar electric system , energy storage system  or paired solar and storage system; and
(B) Meet any other certification requirements set forth in rules adopted by the department.
(b) Pursuant to the procedures for a contested case under ORS chapter  183, the Director of the
State Department of Energy may deny or revoke a contractor’s eligibility to claim a rebate on behalf
of a customer under this section if the director finds that:
(A) The contractor’s eligibility was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation by the contractor;
(B) The contractor’s  performance for installation of solar electric systems , energy storage
systems  or paired solar and storage systems does not meet industry standards; or
(C) The contractor has misrepresented to customers either  the program established under this
section or the  nature or quality of the solar electric systems , energy storage systems  or paired
solar [ electric] and storage systems for which rebates are available.
[(6)] (7) Prior to commencing installation of a solar electric  system , energy storage system  or
paired solar and storage system, a contractor must  apply to the department to reserve a rebate on
behalf of the customer for whom the solar electric system , energy storage system  or  paired solar
and storage system will be installed.
[(7)] (8) To claim a rebate reserved under subsection [ (6)] (7) of this section, the contractor that
reserved the rebate must submit  to the department verification of the purchase, construction or in-
stallation of the solar electric system , energy storage system  or paired  solar and storage system.
The verification required by this  section shall be made on a form provided by the department and
shall contain:
(a) The location of the solar electric system , energy  storage system  or paired solar and stor-
age system;
(b) A description  of the solar electric system , energy storage system  or paired solar and
storage system;
(c) Evidence that the contractor that constructed or installed the solar electric  system , energy
storage system  or paired solar and storage system has any license, bond, insurance or permit  and
meets any other certification requirements required for the  sale and construction or installation of
the solar electric system , energy storage system  or paired solar and storage system;
(d) A statement signed by both the contractor and the customer for  whom the solar electric
system, energy storage system  or paired  solar and storage system is installed that the customer
has received the full value of the rebate as a reduction in the net cost of  the purchase, construction
or installation of the  system and that the rebate was clearly reflected on an invoice provided to the
customer;  and
(e) Any other information that the department determines is necessary.
[(8)(a)] (9)(a) Pursuant to the procedures for a contested case under ORS chapter 183, the  di-
rector may order the revocation of a rebate or portion of a rebate  made under this section if the
director finds that:
Enrolled Senate Bill 827 (SB 827-INTRO) Page 3
(A) The rebate was obtained by fraud or misrepresentation; or
(B) The rebate was obtained by mistake or miscalculation.
(b) As soon as the order of revocation under this subsection becomes  final, the department im-
mediately shall proceed to recover the rebate or portion of the rebate that is the subject of the  or-
der of revocation.  All moneys provided to a contractor attributable to the fraudulently or mistakenly
obtained rebate or portion of the rebate shall be forfeited.
SECTION 3.
 Section 3, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) The Rooftop Solar Incentive Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate  and
distinct from the General Fund. Moneys in the Rooftop Solar Incentive Fund shall consist of:
(a) Amounts donated to the fund;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise  transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Other amounts deposited into the fund from any public or private source.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the State Department of Energy to be
used to issue rebates pursuant to section 2 , chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019,  [of this 2019 Act ] and
to pay the costs and expenses of the department related to  the administration and implementation
of sections 1 to 4 , chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019  [ of this 2019 Act ].
(3) Over the course of a calendar  year, no more than 50 percent of moneys available for issuing
rebates from the fund may be used to issue rebates for solar  electric systems , energy storage
systems  or paired solar and storage systems constructed or installed for nonresidential customers.
(4) Over the course of a calendar year, no more than 25  percent of moneys available for
issuing rebates from the fund may be used to issue  rebates for energy storage systems
paired with previously purchased and installed solar electric systems.
[(4)] (5) In each calendar year, 25 percent of all moneys available for issuing rebates  from the
fund must be  reserved for rebates for solar electric systems , energy storage systems  or paired
solar and storage systems constructed or installed for low or  moderate income residential customers
and low-income service providers. If the department was unable  to obtain a sufficient number of
approvable applications to  meet the requirements of this subsection in the previous calendar year,
the department may, in the current calendar year,  issue rebates, in an amount that does not exceed
the 25 percent reserved for the prior calendar year less the amount of  rebates made to low or
moderate income residential customers and  low-income service providers, to residential customers
that are not low or moderate income residential customers or low-income service providers.
SECTION 4.
 Section 4, chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) No later than September 15 of each year, the State  Department of Energy shall
provide a report to the Legislative Assembly, in the manner provided  in ORS 192.245, on the rebates
claimed under section 2 , chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019,  [ of this 2019 Act ] for solar  electric sys-
tems, energy storage systems  and paired solar and storage systems  during the previous
[calendar] fiscal year.
(2) The report shall detail:
(a) The number, size and location of solar  electric systems installed for residential customers for
which a rebate was claimed;
(b) The number, size and location of solar electric systems installed for low-income service pro-
viders for which a rebate was claimed;
(c) The number  and storage capacity of energy storage systems and  paired solar and storage
systems installed for which a rebate was claimed; and
(d) The estimated amount  of greenhouse gas emissions reduced or avoided due to the installation
of systems for which rebates were claimed.
(3) The report shall include a review by the department addressing whether the goals of the
rebate program are being met and recommendations on whether the rebate  amount limits set forth
in section 2 , chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019,  [ of this 2019 Act ] or the percentages set forth  in
section 3 , chapter 655, Oregon Laws 2019,  [ of this 2019 Act ] should be modified.
(4) The report may include recommendations for legislation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 827 (SB 827-INTRO) Page 4
Passed by Senate February 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 827 (SB 827-INTRO) Page 5